backups/20191114-os.lexc
Multichar_Symbols
%>				! Morpheme boundary

%<v%>				! Verb
%<noun%>			! Noun
%<a-stem%>			! a-stem noun
%<ja-stem%>			! ja-stem noun
%<wa-stem%>			! wa-stem noun

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!NOMINAL CHARS!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
%<masc%>			! masculine noun
%<fem%>				! feminine noun
%<neut%>			! neuter noun

%<a-stem%>			! a-stem noun

%<nom%>				! nominative case
%<gen%>				! genitive case
%<dat%>				! dative case
%<acc%>				! accusative case
%<instr%>			! instrumental case

%{E%}				! Archiphoneme e/a in the dative and genitive cases
%{O%}                           ! Archiphoneme o/a in the plural of a-stems
%{M%}				! Archiphomene m/n in dative plural
%{NAPL%}			! Neuter a-stem plural morpheme; u or zero depending on syllable weight

%<prn%>				! Pronoun

%<pers%>			! Personal Pronoun
%<poss%>			! Possessive Pronoun
%<demo%>			! Demonstrative Pronoun
%<comp%>			! Compound Pronoun "this"
%<inter%>			! Interrogative Pronoun
%<ort%>				! Locative Pronoun
%<wo%>				! Locative Pronoun- where?
%<woher%>			! Locative Pronoun- whence?
%<wohin%>			! Locative Pronoun- whiter?
%<indef%>			! Indefinite Pronoun

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!VERBAL CHARS!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
%<inf%>				! Infinitive
%<act%>				! Active
%<pass%>			! Passive
%<pres%>			! Present tense
%<pret%>			! Preterite tense
%<indic%>			! Indicative mood
%<opt%>				! Optative/Subjunctive mood
%<impv%>			! Imperative mood

%<1st%>				! First Person
%<2nd%>				! Second Person
%<3rd%>				! Third Person

%<sg%>				! Singular
%<du%>				! Dual
%<pl%>				! Plural

%<pastpart%>			! Past Participle

%<str%>				! Strong Declension
%<wk%>				! Weak Declension

%<class1%>			! first class
%<class2%>			! second class
%<class3a%>			! class 3a strong verb
%<class3b%>			! class 3b strong verb
%<class4%>			! class 4 strong verb
%<class5%>			! class 5 strong verb
%<class6%>			! class 6 strong verb
%<class7%>			! class 7 strong verb

%<irrecgular%>			!irregular verb

th				! th phoneme which is actually one sound

%{I%}				! i-infix in strong verbs

LEXICON Root
Nouns 				; 
Verbs 				; 
Pronouns			;

LEXICON Pronouns		
Personal-Pronouns			;
Possessive-Pronouns			;
Demonstrative-Pronouns			;
Compound-Pronouns			;
Interrogative-Pronouns			;
Ortsadverbien-Pronouns			;

LEXICON Nouns
A-Stem				;

LEXICON Masc-A-Stem
%<nom%>%<sg%>:0			#	;
%<gen%>%<sg%>:%{E%}s		#	;
%<dat%>%<sg%>:%{E%}		#	;
%<acc%>%<sg%>:0			#	;
%<instr%>%<sg%>:u		#	; !extremely rare case remnant, consider removing
!%<instr%>:o             	#       ; ! variant form of instrumental case

%<nom%>%<pl%>:os         	#       ; ! consider changing to %{O%}s to account for scribal variation
%<gen%>%<pl%>:o            	#       ; 
%<dat%>%<pl%>:u%{M%}            #       ;
%<dat%>%<pl%>:on	        #       ;
%<acc%>%<pl%>:os         	#       ; ! consider changing to %{O%}s to account for scribal variation
%<instr%>%<pl%>:u               #       ;
!%<nom%>%<pl%>:a		#	; !extreme scribal variant, thus not included in compilation
!%<acc%>%<pl%>:a		#	; !extreme scribal variant, thus not included in compilation

LEXICON Neut-A-Stem
%<nom%>%<sg%>:0                 #       ;
%<gen%>%<sg%>:%{E%}s            #       ;
%<dat%>%<sg%>:%{E%}             #       ;
%<acc%>%<sg%>:0                 #       ;
%<instr%>%<sg%>:u               #       ; !extremely rare case remnant, consider removing
!%<instr%>:o                    #       ; ! variant form of instrumental case

%<nom%>%<pl%>:%{NAPL%}        #       ; ! plural morpheme is either zero or u depending on syllable weight
%<gen%>%<pl%>:o                 #       ;
%<dat%>%<pl%>:u%{M%}            #       ;
%<dat%>%<pl%>:on                #       ;
%<acc%>%<pl%>:%{NAPL%}        	#       ; ! ! plural morpheme is either zero or u depending on syllable weight

LEXICON Masc-Ja-Stem
%<nom%>%<sg%>:i                 #       ;
%<gen%>%<sg%>:ies            	#       ;
%<gen%>%<sg%>:eas               #       ;
!%<gen%>%<sg%>:es               #       ; !rare, thus not included in compilation
%<dat%>%<sg%>:ie             	#       ;
%<dat%>%<sg%>:ea                # 	;
%<acc%>%<sg%>:i                 #       ;
%<instr%>%<sg%>:iu               #       ; !extremely rare case remnant, consider removing
!%<instr%>:o                    #       ; ! variant form of instrumental case

%<nom%>%<pl%>:ios                #       ; ! consider changing to %{O%}s to account for scribal variation
%<gen%>%<pl%>:io                 #       ;
%<gen%>%<pl%>:eo                 #       ;
%<dat%>%<pl%>:iun            #       ;
%<dat%>%<pl%>:ion                #       ;
%<acc%>%<pl%>:ios                #       ; ! consider changing to %{O%}s to account for scribal variation

LEXICON Neut-Ja-Stem
Masc-Ja-Stem				;

LEXICON Masc-Wa-Stem
%<nom%>%<sg%>:u                 #       ;
%<nom%>%<sg%>:o                 #       ;
%<gen%>%<sg%>:wes               #       ;
%<dat%>%<sg%>:we                #       ;
%<dat%>%<sg%>:wa                #       ;
%<acc%>%<sg%>:u                 #       ;
%<acc%>%<sg%>:o                 #       ;

LEXICON Neut-Wa-Stem
%<nom%>%<sg%>:u                 #       ;
%<gen%>%<sg%>:uwes               #       ; 
%<gen%>%<sg%>:owes               #       ;
%<dat%>%<sg%>:uwe                #       ;
%<acc%>%<sg%>:u                 #       ;

!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON Verbs
StrongVerbs                     ;
WeakVerbs 			;
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!Strong Verbs!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!
!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!!

LEXICON STR1
%<inf%>:%>an		 	# ;	
StrTempus                         ;
%<pastpart%>:³%>an		# ;

LEXICON STR2
%<inf%>:%>an              	# ;
StrTempus2                        ;
%<pastpart%>:³%>an              # ;

LEXICON STR3
%<inf%>:%>an                    # ;
StrTempus                         ; !class 3 conjugates like STR1
%<pastpart%>:³%>an              # ;

LEXICON STR4
%<inf%>:%>an                    # ;
:₄ StrTempus4                     ; !classes 4 and 5 are unique but have similar input vowels to class 3, thus the extra subscript
%<pastpart%>:₄³%>an             # ;

LEXICON STR5
%<inf%>:%>an                    # ;
:₄ StrTempus4                     ; !5 is like 4 in inflections
%<pastpart%>:₅³%>an 		# ;

LEXICON STR6				!fine but cannot yet account for the -jan verbs in class 6
%<inf%>:%>an                    # ;
StrTempus                         ; !
%<pastpart%>:%>an               # ; ! faran->gifaran

LEXICON STR7
%<inf%>:%>an                    # ;
:₇ StrTempus                      ; !
%<pastpart%>:³%>an              # ;

LEXICON StrTempus			!for first and 3rd class strong verbs
%<pres%>: STR-INFL-PRES                       ;
%<pret%>: STR-INFL-PRET-1Grade                ;
%<pret%>: STR-INFL-PRET-2Grade         ;
%<impv%>: STR-IMPERATIV                       ;

LEXICON StrTempus2				!for second class strong verbs
%<pres%>: STR-INFL-PRES                       ;
%<pret%>: STR-INFL-PRET-1Grade                ;
%<pret%>: STR-INFL-PRET-2Grade         ;
%<impv%>: STR-IMPERATIV                       ;

LEXICON StrTempus4                              !for 4th class strong verbs
%<pres%>: STR-INFL-PRES                       ;
%<pret%>: STR-INFL-PRET-1Grade                ;
%<pret%>: STR-INFL-PRET-2Grade         ;
%<impv%>: STR-IMPERATIV                       ;

LEXICON STR-INFL-PRES
%<indic%>: STR-INFL-PRES-INDIC		;
%<opt%>: STR-INFL-PRES-OPT		;

LEXICON STR-INFL-PRES-INDIC
%<1st%>%<sg%>:%>u 		# ;
%<2nd%>%<sg%>:%>is			# ;
%<3rd%>%<sg%>:%>iđ			# ;
%<1st%>%<pl%>:%>ađ		# ;
%<2nd%>%<pl%>:%>ađ		# ;
%<3rd%>%<pl%>:%>ađ		# ;

LEXICON A-Stem
god%<noun%>%<masc%>%<a-stem%>:god Masc-A-Stem ;
lîm%<noun%>%<masc%>%<a-stem%>:lîm Masc-A-Stem ;
spiot%<noun%>%<masc%>%<a-stem%>:spiot Masc-A-Stem ;
gidrog%<noun%>%<neut%>%<a-stem%>:gidrog Neut-A-Stem ; ! gidrog* 3, gi-drog*, as., st. N. (a): nhd. Erscheinung, Trugbild; ne. delusion (N.); W.: vgl. mnd. gedrôchnisse, Sb., Trugbild
liof%<noun%>%<neut%>%<a-stem%>:liof Neut-A-Stem ; ! liof* (2) 7, liab* (2), as., st. N. (a): nhd. Liebe, Liebes, Gutes, Erfreuliches, Vorteil; ne. love (N.); W.: mnd. lêve, leeve, F., Freundlichkeit, freundliches Verhalten
stêngraf%<noun%>%<neut%>%<a-stem%>:stêngraf Neut-A-Stem ; ! stêngraf* 1, stê-n-graf*, as., st. N. (a): nhd. „Steingrab“, Felsgrab; ne. sepulchre (N.); W.: mnd. stêngraf, steingraf, N., Steingrab, Hünengrab
ėgithâri%<noun%>%<masc%>%<ja-stem%>:ėgithâr Masc-Ja-Stem 		; ! ėgithâri 1, ėg-ith-âr-i, as., st. M. (ja): nhd. Egger, Eggender; ne. harrower (M.); W.: mnd. egedere, egeder, M., Egger
hėri%<noun%>%<masc%>%<ja-stem%>:hėr Masc-Ja-Stem 		; ! hėri 11, hėr-i, as., st. M. (ja): nhd. Heer, Menge, Volk; ne. army (N.), crowd (N.), people (N.); W.: vgl. mnd. hêr, hêre, N., Heer
sakeri%<noun%>%<masc%>%<ja-stem%>:saker Masc-Ja-Stem 		; ! sakeri* 1, sakkeri, sak-k-eri*, as., st. M. (ja): nhd. Scheiterhaufe, Scheiterhaufen; ne. pyre (N.)
gimôdi%<noun%>%<neut%>%<ja-stem%>:gimôd Neut-Ja-Stem 		; ! gimôdi* 2, gi-mô-d-i*, as., st. N. (ja): nhd. Versöhnung, Befriedigung; ne. reconciliation (N.); W.: mnd. gemote, gemode, N., Gemüt
krūci%<noun%>%<neut%>%<ja-stem%>:krūc Neut-Ja-Stem 		; ! krūci* 18, krūzi, krū-c-i*, krūz-i*, as., st. N. (ja): nhd. Kreuz; ne. cross (N.); W.: mnd. krüze, kruse, krutze, cruese, krüz, N., Kreuz
thiustri%<noun%>%<neut%>%<ja-stem%>:thiustr Neut-Ja-Stem 		; ! thiustri? (2) 4, thi-u-stri?, as., st. N. (ja): nhd. Finsternis; ne. darkness (N.)
dou%<noun%>%<masc%>%<wa-stem%>:do Masc-Wa-Stem 		; ! dou?***, as., st. M. (wa), st. N. (wa): nhd. Tau (N.); ne. dew (N.); W.: mnd. dow, douwe, dawe, dau, M., Tau (N.)
hlêo%<noun%>%<masc%>%<wa-stem%>:hlê Masc-Wa-Stem 		; ! hlêo* 1, hlê-o*, as., st. M. (wa): nhd. Grab, Grabhügel, Hügel; ne. grave (N.)
skado%<noun%>%<masc%>%<wa-stem%>:skad Masc-Wa-Stem 		; ! skado* 2, skad-o*, as., st. M. (wa): nhd. Schatten (M.); ne. shadow (N.); W.: mnd. schade, M., N., Schatten, Dunkel
hrêo%<noun%>%<neut%>%<wa-stem%>:hrê Neut-Wa-Stem 		; ! hrêo* 7, h-rê-o*, as., st. N. (wa): nhd. Leiche; ne. corpse (N.)
saro%<noun%>%<neut%>%<wa-stem%>:sar Neut-Wa-Stem 		; ! saro?***, as., st. N. (wa): nhd. Rüstung; ne. armour (N.)
wurmmelo%<noun%>%<neut%>%<wa-stem%>:wurmmel Neut-Wa-Stem 		; ! wurmmelo* 2, wur-m-mel-o*, as., st. N. (wa): nhd. Wurmmehl; ne. wormdust (N.)
LEXICON StrongVerbs
skrîdan%<v%>%<str%>%<class1%>:skrîd STR1    ;	! nhd. gleiten, schreiten, gehen
wrîtan%<v%>%<str%>%<class1%>:wrît STR1    ;	! nhd. ritzen, reißen, zerreißen, schreiben
teskrîdan%<v%>%<str%>%<class1%>:teskrîd STR1    ;	! nhd. „zerschreiten“, zergehen
tiohan%<v%>%<str%>%<class2%>:tioh STR2    ;	! nhd. ziehen, erziehen
withartiohan%<v%>%<str%>%<class2%>:withartioh STR2    ;	! nhd. „widerziehen“, zurückziehen
biodan%<v%>%<str%>%<class2%>:biod STR2		;
singan%<v%>%<str%>%<class3a%>:sing STR3    ;	! nhd. singen
girinnan%<v%>%<str%>%<class3a%>:girinn STR3    ;	! nhd. gerinnen
werran%<v%>%<str%>%<class3b%>:werr STR3    ;	! nhd. in Verwirrung bringen, in Not bringen, verwirren
farhelan%<v%>%<str%>%<class4%>:farhel STR4    ;	! nhd. verhehlen, verbergen
farsprekan%<v%>%<str%>%<class4%>:farsprek STR4    ;	! nhd. versprechen
bisittian%<v%>%<str%>%<class5%>:bisitt%{I%} STR5    ;	! nhd. belagern, umlagern, umstellen
bigetan%<v%>%<str%>%<class5%>:biget STR5    ;	! nhd. finden, ergreifen
gidragan%<v%>%<str%>%<class6%>:gidrag STR6    ;	! nhd. tragen, bringen, mit sich bringen, gebären
skavan%<v%>%<str%>%<class6%>:skav STR6    ;	! nhd. schaben, kratzen
telâtan%<v%>%<str%>%<class7%>:telât STR7    ;	! nhd. „zerlassen“ (V.), sich zerteilen
nitharfallan%<v%>%<str%>%<class7%>:nitharfall STR7    ;	! nhd. niederfallen
